Maine, session 132, LD1031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 33 MRSA §596 is enacted to read:
§596. Surcharge permitted for time-share association or managing entity
Notwithstanding Title 9-A, section 8-509, subsection 1, a time-share association or
managing entity may impose a surcharge for payments made with a credit card or debit
card for fees or assessments on a time-share owner or for the provision of a specific service
provided by that time-share association or managing entity if the surcharge:
1. Disclosed. Is disclosed clearly to the time-share owner prior to payment; and
2. Does not exceed service cost. Does not exceed the costs associated with providing
the credit card or debit card service that are directly incurred by the time-share association
or managing entity or assessed by an authorized 3rd-party payment service provider for a
credit card or debit card transaction. If there is not a cost assessed by an authorized
3rd-party payment service provider for a debit card transaction, the time-share association
or managing entity may not impose a surcharge associated with a debit card transaction.
A time-share association or managing entity shall disclose to the time-share owner that
the surcharge may be avoided if the time-share owner makes payments by cash, check or
other means that is not a credit card or debit card. A time-share association or managing
entity is not subject to any liability to the issuer of a credit card or an authorized 3rd-party
payment service provider for nonpayment of credit card charges by the time-share owner.